Hawaii, session 2026, SB636.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the university of Hawaii at Hilo was one of only two university of Hawaii campuses that experienced a declining enrollment rate in the fall 2023 semester, marking the third consecutive year of declining fall enrollment.  University of Hawaii at Hilo officials have cited the school's limited brand exposure outside of Hawaii, difficultly retaining students from the mainland, and an increase in online educational opportunities as factors contributing to the school's enrollment issues.  Despite these challenges, the university of Hawaii's requests for funding for positions and initiatives directly related to addressing student enrollment and retention have not been included in the governor's executive budget.  The legislature further finds that these positions and initiatives are vital to ensuring that the school has the necessary staff and resources to retain students and bolster enrollment. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to appropriate funds for one retention coordinator position, one internship coordinator position, and student enrollment management initiatives at the university of Hawaii at Hilo. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and $ or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment of one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) retention coordinator position and one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) internship coordinator position, and student enrollment management initiatives at the university of Hawaii at Hilo; provided that the sums appropriated shall be expended as follows: (1)  $ for fiscal year 2025-2026 and $ for fiscal year 2026-2027 for one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) retention coordinator position; (2)  $ for fiscal year 2025-2026 and $ for fiscal year 2026-2027 for one full-time equivalent (1.0 FTE) internship coordinator position; and (3)  $ for fiscal year 2025-2026 and $ for fiscal year 2026-2027 for student enrollment management initiatives. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the university of Hawaii for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 31, 2050.